src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_18_PRS-SG1-STEM
+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1:%>os K ;
+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1:%>amies K ;
+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2:%>aties K ;

+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2:%>oties K ;
+Quo+Prs:%>oties K ;

+PrsPrc+Act:%>oš NMN_13_ ;
+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ošais K ;
+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ošo K ;

+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos:%>oši K ;
+PrsPrc+Pss:%>am NMN_13_ ;
+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>amo K ;
+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2:%>am K ;


LEXICON V_18_PRT-SG1-STEM
+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1:%>os K ;
+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2:%>ies K ;
+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1:%>amies K ;
+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2:%>aties K ;

+PrfPrc+Act: PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON V-_19_2-Jā_
 IV_19_2-Jā_	;
 TV_19_2-Jā_	;
LEXICON IV_19_2-Jā_
+WORK: K;
LEXICON TV_19_2-Jā_
+WORK: K;
LEXICON IV_19_2-REFL_
+WORK: K ;
LEXICON TV_19_2-REFL_
+WORK: K ;

LEXICON V-_20_3-Jā_
IV_20_3-Jā_ ;
TV_20_3-Jā_ ;
LEXICON IV_20_3-Jā_
+WORK: K ;
LEXICON	 TV_20_3-Jā_
+WORK: K ;

LEXICON IV_20_3-REFL_
+WORK: K ;
LEXICON TV_20_3-REFL_
+WORK: K ;



LEXICON DEB
!+Deb+Prs@R.DEB.ON@:00@R.DEB.ON@ K ;
!+Deb+Quo0@R.DEB.ON@:%>ot@R.DEB.ON@ K ;

 @U.DEB.ON@ DEB-PRS ;
 @U.DEB.ON@ DEB-QUO ;

LEXICON DEB-PRS
+Deb+Prs: K ;
LEXICON DEB-QUO
+Deb+Quo:%>ot K ;

LEXICON PRSPRC-ACT-PRED2
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>s K ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i K ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>a K ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>as K ;


LEXICON PSTPRC-ACT-OBLIQUE
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>uša K ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ušam K ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ušu K ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ušā K ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>uši K ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ušu K ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ušiem K ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ušus K ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>ušos K ;
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ušais K ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ušā K ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ušajam K ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ušo K ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ušajā K ;
+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def:%>ušais K ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ušie K ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ušo K ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ušajiem K ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ušos K ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ušajos K ;
+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ušie K ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>usi K ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ušas K ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ušai K ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ušu K ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef:%>ušā K ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ušas K ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ušu K ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ušām K ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ušas K ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef:%>ušās K ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>usī K ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ušās K ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ušajai K ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ušo K ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def:%>ušajā K ;
+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def:%>usī K ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ušās K ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ušo K ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ušajām K ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ušās K ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def:%>ušajās K ;
+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def:%>ušās K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc: 
