src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
iedomāties+V:iedomā TV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
plunčoties+V:plunčo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
sarindoties+V:sarindo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
sailgoties+V:sailgo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
paspēkoties+V:paspēko IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
pajokoties+V:pajoko IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
nolūkoties+V:nolūko IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
tēloties+V:tēlo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iztēloties+V:iztēlo TV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
atveseļoties+V:atveseļo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
draiskuļoties+V:draiskuļo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
nodusmoties+V:nodusmo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
attaisnoties+V:attaisno IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
izsapņoties+V:izsapņo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
atkrēpoties+V:atkrēpo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
sasparoties+V:sasparo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
izgudroties+V:izgudro IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iemauroties+V:iemauro IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
atbalsoties+V:atbalso IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
staltoties+V:stalto IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
pārgatavoties+V:pārgatavo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
robežoties+V:robežo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
asociēties+V:asociē IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
ciemoties+V:ciemo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
dubultoties+V:dubulto IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
gremdēties+V:gremdē IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
karāties+V:karā IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
krunkoties+V:krunko IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
līksmoties+V:līksmo IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
niknoties+V:nikno IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
runāties+V:runā IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
tērēties+V:tērē IV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iegādāties+V:iegādā TV_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
aizrunāties:aizrunā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
apdomāties:apdomā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
apputeksnēties:apputeksnē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
apvalkāties:apvalkā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
atlodēties:atlodē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
atstutēties:atstutē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
bloķēties:bloķē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
demokratizēties:demokratizē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
eiropeizēties:eiropeizē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iefiltrēties:iefiltrē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iekāsēties:iekāsē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iesprauslāties:iesprauslā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
izbradāties:izbradā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
izlēkāties:izlēkā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
izsautēties:izsautē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
kaitēties:kaitē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
līkņāties:līkņā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
noformēties:noformē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
noorganizēties:noorganizē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
nostaigāties:nostaigā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
pabēdāties:pabēdā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
parūpēties:parūpē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
plunčāties:plunčā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
pārstrādāties:pārstrādā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
sadziedāties:sadziedā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
saliedēties:saliedē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
sasaukāties:sasaukā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
savalkāties:savalkā V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
stāžēties:stāžē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
vēzēties:vēzē V-_19_2-Jā_  "" ;
iemācīties+V:iemācī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
apšķebināties+V:apšķebinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
spēcināties+V:spēcinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pavilcināties+V:pavilcinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ieradināties+V:ieradinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izvēdināties+V:izvēdinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
vājināties+V:vājinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
nokrekšķināties+V:nokrekšķinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pamīlināties+V:pamīlinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
sajūsmināties+V:sajūsminā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
nocepināties+V:nocepinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ieperināties+V:ieperinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iestiprināties+V:iestiprinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
noskurināties+V:noskurinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
atrisināties+V:atrisinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
šķetināties+V:šķetinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
uzsārtināties+V:uzsārtinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izsutināties+V:izsutinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iekladzināties+V:iekladzinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
atspirdzināties+V:atspirdzinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iesmaržināties+V:iesmaržinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
skatīties+V:skatī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
paskatīties+V:paskatī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
apskatīties+V:apskatī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ieskatīties+V:ieskatī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izskatīties+V:izskatī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
attīstīties+V:attīstī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
atcerēties+V:atcerē TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
dalīties+V:dalī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ganīties+V:ganī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izbrīnīties+V:izbrīnī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
klausīties+V:klausī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
lielīties+V:lielī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
paātrināties+V:paātrinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pildīties+V:pildī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
rušināties+V:rušinā IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
vēlēties+V:vēlē TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
blandīties+V:blandī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
rīstīties+V:rīstī IV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
uzdrošināties+V:uzdrošinā TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
taisīties+V:taisī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
grasīties+V:grasī TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
kaunēties+V:kaunē TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
gribēties+V:gribē TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
aizmanīties:aizmanī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
apklausīties:apklausī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
apvaldīties:apvaldī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
apzināties+V:apzinā TV_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
atsacīties:atsacī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iedrebēties:iedrebē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ieklunkšķēties:ieklunkšķē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iemanīties:iemanī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ieskanēties:ieskanē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ietrinkšķēties:ietrinkšķē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
iečinkstēties:iečinkstē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izbārstīties:izbārstī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izlielīties:izlielī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izpūlēties:izpūlē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
izvīstīties:izvīstī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
maisīties:maisī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
nolielīties:nolielī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
noskatīties:noskatī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
novalstīties:novalstī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
paganīties:paganī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pamīdīties:pamīdī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pasvārstīties:pasvārstī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
piepūlēties:piepūlē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
pārklausīties:pārklausī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
raudzīties:raudzī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
sakaunēties:sakaunē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
sarakstīties:sarakstī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
sataupīties:sataupī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
slaucīties:slaucī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
uzticēties:uzticē V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
ārdīties:ārdī V-_20_3-Jā_  "" ;
adaptēties+V:adaptē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
āķēties+V:āķē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
angažēties+V:angažē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
apsēkloties+V:apsēklo IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
augļoties+V:augļo IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
autorizēties+V:autorizē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
bazūnēties+V:bazūnē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
braukāties+V:braukā IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
bružāties+V:bružā IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
centrēties+V:centrē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
debitēties+V:debitē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
demonstrēties+V:demonstrē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
disciplinēties+V:disciplinē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
dziedēties+V:dziedē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
folklorizēties+V:folklorizē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
grābāties+V:grābā IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
identificēties+V:identificē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
instruēties+V:instruē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
karsēties+V:karsē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
knābāties+V:knābā IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
kotēties+V:kotē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
legalizēties+V:legalizē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
miekšķēties+V:miekšķē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
motivēties+V:motivē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
publicēties+V:publicē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
rehabilitēties+V:rehabilitē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
sintezēties+V:sintezē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
sprēgāties+V:sprēgā IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
traumēties+V:traumē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
vulgarizēties+V:vulgarizē IV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
izrādīties+V:izrādī TV_19_2-REFL_  "" ;
apdullināties+V:apdullinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
atslābināties+V:atslābinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
atvaļināties+V:atvaļinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
atvieglināties+V:atvieglinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
bīdīties+V:bīdī IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
blīkšķināties+V:blīkšķinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
bolīties+V:bolī IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
čabināties+V:čabinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
cerēties+V:cerē IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
cietināties+V:cietinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
čurkstināties+V:čurkstinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
dārdināties+V:dārdinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
darināties+V:darinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
dipināties+V:dipinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
drošināties+V:drošinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
dzesināties+V:dzesinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
dzisināties+V:dzisinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
gānīties+V:gānī IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
iepazīstināties+V:iepazīstinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
iežēlināties+V:iežēlinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
kārdināties+V:kārdinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
kodīties+V:kodī IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
lecināties+V:lecinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
mācīties+V:mācī TV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
padārdzināties+V:padārdzinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
pārbaudīties+V:pārbaudī IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
remdināties+V:remdinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
sacerēties+V:sacerē IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
smalcināties+V:smalcinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
tapināties+V:tapinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
zibināties+V:zibinā IV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
atminēties+V:atminē TV_20_3-REFL_  "" ;
